Hawaii statutes.
[§431:10H-224] Reserve standards; life
insurance policies or riders. (a) When long-term care benefits are
provided through the acceleration of benefits under group or individual life
policies or riders to these policies, the policy reserves for the benefits
shall be determined in accordance with section 431:5-307. Claim reserves shall
also be established in the case where the policy or rider is in claim status.

(b) Reserves for policies subject to this
section shall be based on the multiple decrement model utilizing all relevant
decrements except for voluntary termination rates. Single decrement
approximations are acceptable if the calculation produces essentially similar
reserves, if the reserve is clearly more conservative, or if the reserve is immaterial.
The calculations may take into account the reduction in life insurance benefits
due to the payment of long-term care benefits. However, in no event shall the
reserves for the long-term care benefit and the life insurance benefit be less
than the reserves for the life insurance benefit assuming no long-term care
benefit.

(c) In the development and calculation of
reserves for policies and riders subject to this section, due regard shall be
given to applicable policy provisions, marketing methods, administrative
procedures, and all other considerations which have an impact on projected
claim costs, including but not limited to the following:

(1) Definition of insured events;

(2) Covered long-term care facilities;

(3) Existence of home convalescence care coverage;

(4) Definition of facilities;

(5) Existence or absence of barriers to eligibility;

(6) Premium waiver provision;

(7) Renewability;

(8) Ability to raise premiums;

(9) Marketing method;

(10) Underwriting procedures;

(11) Claims adjustment procedures;

(12) Waiting period;

(13) Maximum benefit;

(14) Availability of eligible facilities;

(15) Margins in claim costs;

(16) Optional nature of benefit;

(17) Delay in eligibility for benefit;

(18) Inflation protection provisions; and

(19) Guaranteed insurability option.

(d) Any applicable valuation morbidity table
shall be certified as appropriate as a statutory valuation table by a member of
the American Academy of Actuaries. [L 1999, c 93, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next